Hawaii statutes.
§134-4 Transfer, possession of firearms.
(a) No transfer of any rifle having a barrel length of sixteen inches or over
or any shotgun having a barrel length of eighteen inches or over, whether
usable or unusable, serviceable or unserviceable, modern or antique, registered
under prior law or by a prior owner, or unregistered shall be made to any
person under the age of eighteen years, except as provided by section 134-5.

(b) No person shall possess any firearm that
is owned by another, regardless of whether the owner has consented to
possession of the firearm, without a permit from the chief of police of the
appropriate county, except as provided in subsection (c) and section 134-5.

(c) Any lawfully acquired rifle or shotgun may
be lent to an adult for use within the State for a period not to exceed fifteen
days without a permit; provided that where the rifle or shotgun is to be used
outside of the State, the loan may be for a period not to exceed seventy-five
days.

(d) No person shall knowingly lend a firearm
to any person who is prohibited from ownership or possession of a firearm under
section 134-7.

(e) After July 1, 1992, no person shall
bring or cause to be brought into the State an assault pistol. No assault
pistol may be sold or transferred on or after July 1, 1992, to anyone
within the State other than to a dealer licensed under section 134-32 or the
chief of police of any county except that any person who obtains title by
bequest or intestate succession to an assault pistol registered within the
State shall, within ninety days, render the weapon permanently inoperable, sell
or transfer the weapon to a licensed dealer or the chief of police of any
county, or remove the weapon from the State. [L 1988, c 275, pt of §2; am L
1992, c 286, §2]

Case Notes

Where defendant's
conviction and sentence under §708-840 was an included offense under §134-6(a)
and defendant's convictions under both §708-840 and subsection (a) violated
§701-109(1)(a), defendant’s conviction and sentence under §708-840 reversed.
91 H. 33, 979 P.2d 1059.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next